src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kidd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiđđ â-stem: # Noun 'hand' - full paradigm
# 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
# 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
# 1.1.1 Sg.Ill in ʹ-e
# 1.1.1.1 Has Gradation
# 1.1.1.1.1 Monophthong
# 1.1.1.1.1.1 Homogenous Consonant
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2 Sg.Nom Extra Strong Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.3 Sg.Ill Extra Strong Grade
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiđđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Gen: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Acc: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Ill: ǩiʹđđe
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Loc: ǩiiđâst
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Com: ǩiiđin
     ǩiđđ+N+Ess: ǩiđđân
     ǩiđđ+N+Par: ǩiđđâd
     ǩiđđ+N+Sg+Abe: [ǩiiđtaa, ǩiiđtää]
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Nom: ǩiiđ
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Gen: ǩiiđi
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Acc: ǩiiđid
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Ill: ǩiiđid
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Loc: ǩiiđin
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Com: ǩiiđivuiʹm
     ǩiđđ+N+Pl+Abe: [ǩiiđitaa, ǩiiđitää]
     ǩiđđ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiiđâž
